Washington statutes.
RCW 18.233.070

Rule making—Application of uniform disciplinary act.

(1) The department shall establish and adopt rules governing the administration of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a license, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 175 s 8.]